Utah statutes.
53A-23-101.   School board reserve fund.

Each local school board may establish and maintain a reserve fund to accumulate funds to meet the capital outlay costs of the school district, including costs for planning, constructing, replacing, improving, equipping, and furnishing school buildings and purchasing school sites.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

